Tennessee, session 114, SB1968.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-3001(c)(1)(B)(i), is amended by
adding "attendance," before "academic," wherever it appears.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-3009, is amended by adding
the following as new subsections:
(o)
(1) If a student withdraws from an LEA, as defined in § 49-1-103, in
which the student was receiving tier two or tier three interventions pursuant to the
LEA's progressive truancy plan, and the student does not transfer to another
LEA, as defined in § 49-1-103, then the director of schools shall report the
student's absences to the judge with juvenile jurisdiction in the county in which
the student resides.
(2) Each case must be dealt with in such manner as the judge may
determine to be in the best interest of the student, consistent with §§ 37-1-132,
37-1-168, and 37-1-169. In the event a student in kindergarten through grade
twelve (K-12) is adjudicated to be unruly because the student has accumulated
five (5) days or more of unexcused absences during any school year, the judge
may assess a fine of up to fifty dollars ($50.00) or community service, in the
discretion of the judge, against the parent or legal guardian of the student.
SB1968
011662
- 1 -

(3) A referral to juvenile court for conduct described in this subsection (o)
must be accompanied by a statement from the director of schools certifying that:
(A) The school applied the progressive truancy interventions of
the progressive truancy plan adopted under subsection (d) for the student
while the student was enrolled in the LEA; and
(B) The student withdrew from the LEA and has not enrolled in
another LEA.
(p) If a student transfers during the school year, then the number of unexcused
absences accumulated in the school year by the student at the school or LEA from
which the student is transferring must be included in the number of unexcused absences
for the student at the receiving school or LEA for purposes of this section.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-3009(i), is amended by adding
"or subsection (o), if applicable" after "with subsection (h)".
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-3009(g), is amended by
deleting "five (5) hours of".
SECTION 5. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-3007, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection:
(i) If a student transfers during the school year, then the number of unexcused
absences accumulated in the school year by the student at the school or LEA from
which the student is transferring must be included in the number of unexcused absences
for the student at the receiving school or LEA for purposes of this section.
SECTION 6. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 011662